District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.08

Reduction of compensation for subsequent injury to same member.

The period of compensation payable under the schedule in § 1-623.07 is reduced by the period of compensation paid or payable under the schedule for an earlier injury if: (1) Compensation in both cases is for disability of the same member or function or different parts of the same member or function or for disfigurement; and (2) the Mayor finds that compensation payable for the later disability, in whole or in part, would duplicate the compensation payable for the preexisting disability. In such a case, compensation for disability continuing after the scheduled period starts on the expiration of that period as reduced under this section.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2308, 25 DCR 5740

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-624.8.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.8.